California, session 20252026, AB2242.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 231.8 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 231.7, to read:231.8. (a) On or before the start of the 2027–28 school year, each local educational agency shall display, at each schoolsite it maintains, in at least one men’s restroom, one women’s restroom, and one all-gender restroom used by pupils, a legible poster printed in English and any primary language other than English spoken by at least 15 percent of pupils enrolled at the schoolsite, determined pursuant to Section 48985, that is at least 12 by 18 inches in size that contains all of the following information:(1) An age-appropriate description of sextortion.(2) Contact information for the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline. local, state, and federal law enforcement for purposes of reporting and seeking assistance related to sextortion.(3) Contact information for a national suicide prevention hotline. the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline.(4) The Uniform Resource Locator (URL), quick response (QR) code, or other similar resource to identify the internet website for informational and support resources regarding online enticement, including sextortion, provided by the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children or any federally funded successor entity.(b) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall develop and post on the department’s internet website a model template of the poster described in subdivision (a) for use by local educational agencies.(c) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school maintaining any combination of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.(2) “Schoolsite” means a school serving any combination of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, maintained by a local educational agency.(3) “Sextortion” means the threat to use sexual or intimate images or videos, however obtained, to compel another person to produce sexual or intimate images or videos, engage in sexual acts, or provide anything of value.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.